Utah statutes.
17C-3-201.   Economic development project area budget -- Requirements for
adopting -- Contesting the budget or procedure -- Time limit.
(1) (a)  If an agency anticipates funding all or a portion of a post-June 30,
1993 economic development project area plan with tax increment, the agency
shall, subject to Section 17C-3-202, adopt a project area budget as provided
in this part.
(b)  An economic development project area budget adopted on or after March 30,
2009 shall specify:
(i)  the number of tax years for which the agency will be allowed to receive
tax increment from the project area; and
(ii)  the percentage of tax increment or maximum cumulative dollar amount of
tax increment the agency is entitled to receive from the project area under
the project area budget.
(2)  To adopt an economic development project area budget, the agency shall:
(a)  prepare a draft of an economic development project area budget;
(b)  make a copy of the draft project area budget available to the public at
the agency's offices during normal business hours;
(c)  provide notice of the budget hearing as required by Part 4, Economic
Development Notice Requirements;
(d)  hold a public hearing on the draft project area budget and, at that
public hearing, allow public comment on:
(i)  the draft project area budget; and
(ii)  whether the draft project area budget should be revised, adopted, or
rejected;
(e) (i)  if required under Subsection 17C-3-203(1), obtain the approval of the
taxing entity committee on the draft project area budget or a revised version
of the draft project area budget; or
(ii)  if applicable, comply with the requirements of Subsection 17C-3-203(2);
and
(f)  after the budget hearing, hold a board meeting in the same meeting as the
public hearing or in a subsequent meeting to:
(i)  consider comments made and information presented at the public hearing
relating to the draft project area budget; and
(ii)  adopt by resolution the draft project area budget, with any revisions,
as the project area budget.
(3) (a)  For a period of 30 days after the agency's adoption of the project
area budget under Subsection (2)(f), any person in interest may contest the
project area budget or the procedure used to adopt the project area budget if
the budget or procedure fails to comply with applicable statutory
requirements.
(b)  After the 30-day period under Subsection (3)(a) expires, no person may
contest the project area budget or procedure used to adopt the project area
budget for any cause.
